src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON h_flt1_3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>aini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>aini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>air Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>air Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu:a N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;
!
LEXICON h2 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** hjarta
               h1e        ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu:	  N_PLG_na    ;
!!
LEXICON h3/41
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h3 ;
 h41 ;
 !
LEXICON h3/5
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h3 ;
  h5 ;
!
LEXICON h3/22
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h3  ;
  h22 ;
!
LEXICON h3_s ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** universitet
         h3e         ;
! +N+Neu: S_N_S_CMPND ;
         h_flt3      ;
!
LEXICON h3 ! ting, orð, verk, val 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** orð
         h3e         ;
! +N+Neu: S_N_A_CMPND ;
         h_flt3      ;
!
LEXICON h3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt3f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt3 ;
!
LEXICON h_flt3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
 !
LEXICON h3_2 ! politi
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h3_2e   ;
  h_flt3_2 ;
!
LEXICON h3_2e 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** politinum
 			+N+Neu:  	S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:num  Neu_Flag ; ! politinum
 		    +N+Neu:i 	S_N_SGD  ; ! politii, politiinum
 		    +N+Neu:s 	S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt3_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h_flt3 ;
!
!LEXICON h4/5
!  h4 ;
!  h5 ;
!
LEXICON h4 ! lið
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h4e    ;
  h_flt4 ;
!
LEXICON h4e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:  		S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i 		Neu_Flag ; ! liði
 			  +N+Neu:  		S_N_SGD  ; ! lið, liðnum
 			  +N+Neu:s 		S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +N+Neu: N_PLNA    ;
  +N+Neu: N_PLD     ; ! liðunum
  +N+Neu: N_PLG     ;
!
LEXICON h4_2 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** guv
  h4_2e  ;
  h_flt4_2 ;
!
LEXICON h4_2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:  Neu_Flag ; ! guv
 			  +N+Neu:i S_N_SGD  ; ! guvi, guvinum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt4_2  
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt4 ;
!
LEXICON h4_3/41
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h4_3e ;
  h_flt41 ;
!
LEXICON h4_3 ! bað
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h4_3e  ;
  h_flt4_3 ;
!
LEXICON h4_3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bað sg
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! bað, baðnum
 			  +N+Neu:i S_N_SGD  ; ! baði, baðinum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt4_3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt4 ;
!
LEXICON h4_4 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** læ
  h4_4e  ;
  h_flt4_4 ;
!
LEXICON h4_4e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:inum Neu_Flag ; ! læinum
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! læ, lænum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;
!
LEXICON h_flt4_4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h_flt4 ;
!
LEXICON h5/3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h5 ;
  h3 ;
!
LEXICON h5/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h5 ;
  h6 ;
!
LEXICON h5 ! barn
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h5e    ;
  h_flt5 ;
!
LEXICON h5e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt5
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h6/4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h6 ;
  h4 ;
!
LEXICON h6 ! lag
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h6e    ;
  h_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON h6e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i Neu_Flag ; ! blaði
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! blað, blaðnum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ; !
LEXICON h_flt6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h7/3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
h7 ;
h3 ;
!
LEXICON h7/3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
h7 ;
h3e ;
!
LEXICON h7/4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
h7 ;
h4 ;
!
LEXICON h7 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bræv
 +N+Neu:       S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:       S_N_SGDG_is ;
 +N+Neu:^ØUML  N_PLNA      ;
 +N+Neu:^ØUML  N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG       ;
!
LEXICON h8 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** land
  h8e    ;
  h_flt8 ;
!
LEXICON h8e ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** land sg
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt8 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** land
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h9/10
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h9  ;
  h10 ;
!
LEXICON h9/kv2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h9  ;
  kv2 ;
!
LEXICON h9/41
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h9  ;
  h41 ;
!
LEXICON h9 ! blikk
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h9e    ;
  h_flt9 ;
!
LEXICON h9e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h10 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** fall
  h10e    ;
  h_flt10 ;
!
LEXICON h10e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt10
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h11e/22f
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  h11e    ;
  h_flt22 ;
!
LEXICON h_flt22/11e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h_flt22 ;
 h11e ;
!
LEXICON h11 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** hús
  h11e    ;
  h_flt11 ;
!
LEXICON h11e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h12 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** glas
  h12e    ;
  h_flt12 ;
!
LEXICON h12e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt12
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h13 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** setur
  h13e    ;
  h_flt13 ;
!
LEXICON h13e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt13
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h13_2 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ásin
  h13_2e    ;
  h_flt13_2 ;
!
LEXICON h13_2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH S_N_SGDG_is ;
!
LEXICON h_flt13_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:^EPH N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h14 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pistr
  h14e    ;
  h_flt14 ;
!
LEXICON h14e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:r  S_N_SGNA  ;
 +N+Neu:r  S_N_SGD_i ;
 +N+Neu:ur S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON h_flt14
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu:r N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:r N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:r N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h15 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** tjaldur
  h15e ;
  h_flt15 ;
!
LEXICON h15e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:rið Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur  Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:rið Neu_Flag  ;
             +N+Neu:r   S_N_SGD_i ;
             +N+Neu:ur  S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON h_flt15
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%>ur   Neu_Flag  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>rini Neu_Flag  ;
			 +N+Neu:^UUML%>r    N_PLD     ;
			 +N+Neu:r           N_PLG     ;
!
! Start here.
LEXICON h16 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** skýggj
  h16e    ;
  h_flt16 ;
!
LEXICON h16e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 			  +N+Neu:        	 S_N_SGNA  ;
			  +N+Neu:^JI    	 S_N_SGD_i ; ! skýggi
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: 			 Neu_Flag  ; ! skýggj
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:^GGDEL%>num Neu_Flag  ; ! skýnum
			  +N+Neu:^GGDEL		 S_N_SGG_s ; ! skýs
!
LEXICON h_flt16
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
!
LEXICON h16_2 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** hoyggj
  h16_2e ;
  h_flt16_2 ;
