src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
læ+CmpNP/None:læ h4_4e ;
ben+CmpNP/None:ben h3/22 ;
nes+CmpNP/None:nes h11e/22f ;
LEXICON Nouns
lógvaklapp:lógva#klapp h9/10 ;
krampaanfall:krampa#an#fall h10 ;
faldfjøll:faldfjøll h_flt10 ;
fjarljós:fjarljós h11 ;
randarhús:randarhús h_flt11 ;
diktat:diktat h3/41 ;
fundament:fundament h3/41 ;
alternativ:alternativ h3/41 ;
tannagras:tannagras h12 ;
mýrisnípugras:mýrisnípugras h12 ;
saks:saks h_flt11 ; ! XXX check 12?
eygnagløs:eygnagløs h_flt12 ;
summargrøs:summargrøs h_flt12 ;
brotben:brotben h3/22 ;
rokkahjarta:rokka#hjart h2 ;
svínahjarta:svína#hjart h2 ;
manshjarta:mans#hjart h2 ;
akurskritt:akurskritt h9/kv2 ;
andsvar:andsvar h5/3 ;
grótkast:grót#kast h5/3 ;
dammtalv:dammtalv h5/3 ;
fornbræv:forn#bræv h7/3 ;
læringsspæl:lærings#spæl h7/3 ;
kongaspæl:konga#spæl h7/3 ;
enniknæ:enniknæ h7/4 ;
ennispónsknæ:ennispónsknæ h7/4 ;
ásin:ásin h13_2 ;
orkestur:orkestur h13 ;
lisshol:lisshol h3 ;
bingo:bingo h4_3/41 ;
sýnisskáp:sýnisskáp h3 ;
ljómborð:ljóm#borð h3 ;
ekko:ekko h4_3/41 ;
høvuðplagg:høvuð#plagg h10 ;
hásig:há#sig h4_3 ;
kókimark:kóki#mark h3/5 ;
kisil:kisil h13_2e ;
hall:hall h9/10 ;
desigramm:desi#gramm h9/41 ;
organogramm:organo#gramm h9/41 ;
prinsippprogramm:prinsipp#pro#gramm h9/41 ;
herðaklapp:herða#klapp h9/10 ;
hopp:hopp h9 ;
glopr:glop h14 ;
glopur:glopur h13 ;
klingruleikhús:klingru#leik#hús h11 ;
hyggjuvit:hyggju#vit h3e ;
illrið:ill#rið h3_2 ;
landsskúlaráð:lands#skúla#ráð h4_3 ;
lógamál:lógamál h_flt3 ;
ferðslumál:ferðslumál h_flt3 ;
ellisár:ellisár h_flt3 ;
sildavað:sildavað h6/4 ;
fuglavað:fuglavað h6/4 ;
fiskivað:fiskivað h6/4 ;
pústr:púst h14 ;
fiskatrog:fiskatrog h4 ;
lesningstog:lesningstog h4 ;
kjalingarhoyggj:kjalingar#hoyggj h16_2 ;
kirkjugarðshoyggj:kirkju#garðs#hoyggj h16_2 ;
skotherlið:skother#lið h3_2 ;
sýnisbreyð:sýnis#breyð h4_3 ;
styðiljóð:styði#ljóð h4_2 ;
óljóð:ó#ljóð h4_2 ;
fjøruti:fjøruti h_flt4 ;
aningarstrá:aningarstrá h_flt4 ;
sneisaboð:sneisa#boð h_flt4_3 ;
fragdarboð:fragdar#boð h_flt4_3 ;
høvuðsráð:høvuðs#ráð h_flt4_3 ;
endamark:endamark h3/5 ;
sandbak:sandbak h3/5 ;
posaspjaldur:posa#spjald h15 ;
fjørutjaldur:fjøru#tjald h15 ;
partagjald:parta#gjald h5 ;
yrkisgagn:yrkis#gagn h5 ;
vatnflogfar:vatnflogfar h5 ;
morberjatræ:morberja#træ h7 ;
slagtræ:slag#træ h7 ;
skiftitøl:skiftitøl h_flt5 ;
brøðrabørn:brøðrabørn h_flt5 ;
neytatøð:neytatøð h_flt5 ;
reyðflíggj:reyðflíggj h16 ;
stormskýggj:stormskýggj h16 ;
blikufjaðraskýggj:blikufjaðraskýggj h_flt16 ;
fløguskýggj:fløguskýggj h_flt16 ;
studentafelag:studenta#felag h6 ;
slag:slag h6 ;
bókarblað:bókarblað h6 ;
lyndabragð:lyndabragð h5/6 ;
eygbragð:eygbragð h5/6 ;
neyðbragð:neyðbragð h5/6 ;
áløg:áløg h_flt6 ;
brókatøk:bróka#tøk h_flt6 ;
seymaløð:seymaløð h_flt6 ;
básalamb:bása#lamb h8 ;
ílaband:ílaband h8 ;
fjórðaheimsland:fjórða#heims#land h8 ;
sóllond:sóllond h_flt8 ;
eystanlond:eystanlond h_flt8 ;
útlond:útlond h_flt8 ;
læ+CmpNP/None:læ h4_4 ;
drøgg:drøgg h9 ;
bjarnarskinn:bjarnarskinn h9 ;
brotaføll:brotaføll h_flt9 ;
sóttrøll:sóttrøll h_flt9 ;
hvønnfall:hvønnfall h10e ;
borðfall:borðfall h10e ;
óðamannatos:óðamannatos h11e ;
lágættargrús:lágættargrús h11e ;
stjørnuknas:stjørnuknas h12e ;
vaks:vaks h12e ;
mjólkarsukur:mjólkarsukur h13e ;
skúraveður:skúraveður h13e ;
markaskil:markaskil h3e ;
sjampo:sjampo h4_3/41 ;
stýriborðslær:stýriborðslær h7/3e ;
bakborðslær:bakborðslær h7/3e ;
fatlingargrót:fatlingargrót h3e ;
eyrskruv:eyrskruv h4_3e ;
armóð:armóð h4_2e ;
slupr:slup h14e ;
lomvigafleyg:lomviga#fleyg h4_3e ;
sesam:sesam h4e ;
náttarlevnað:náttarlevnað h4e ;
orðasmíð:orða#smíð h4_3e ;
fjørusjóð:fjøru#sjóð h4_2e ;
høsnablóð:høsna#blóð h4_2 ;
ovurmóð:ovur#móð h4_2e ;
orðaskvaldur:orða#skvald h15e ;
orðskvaldur:orð#skvald h15e ;
seyðavask:seyðavask h5e ;
ravsigulmagn:ravsigulmagn h5e ;
farvatn:far#vatn h5e ;
toyggj:toyggj h16e ;
blýggj:blýggj h16e ;
ættarlag:ættarlag h6e ;
starvslag:starvslag h6e ;
íhav:íhav h6e ;
skjútsband:skjútsband h8e ;
málbland:málbland h8e ;
íbland:íbland h8e ;
drabb:drabb h9e ;
írapakk:íra#pakk h9e ;
útnes:útnes h_flt22/11e ;
nes:nes h_flt22/11e ;
longujól:longujól h_flt3f ;
universitet:universitet h3_s ;
garðslið:garðs#lið h3_2 ;
kálvaknæ:kálva#knæ h7/4 ;
havnarlag:havnar#lag h4 ;
lobb h9 ;
listahugflog h4e ;
granattræ:granattræ h7 ;
